Wyoming statutes. Title 22 Elections
Article 4. Referendum

Effective dates. —

Laws 2015, ch. 6, § 3, makes this article effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by Article 4, § 8 of the Wyo. Const. Approved February 25, 2015.

§ 22-24-401.
Right of referendum; limitations.

The people may approve or reject acts of the legislature by the referendum. However, the referendum shall not be applied to dedications of revenue, to appropriations, to local or special legislation, or to laws necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health or safety.

History.

2015 ch. 6, § 1, effective February 25, 2015.

§ 22-24-402.
Application; filing and fee.

A referendum shall be proposed by filing an application with the secretary of state. A fee of one thousand dollars ($1,000.00) shall accompany the application. This fee shall be deposited in the general fund.

History.

2015 ch. 6, § 1, effective February 25, 2015; 2021 ch. 51, § 1, effective July 1, 2021.

The 2021 amendment,

effective July 1, 2021, substituted "one thousand dollars ($1,000.00)" for "five hundred dollars ($500.00)."

§ 22-24-403.
Application; contents.

The application shall be on a form prescribed by the secretary of state and shall include:

The act to be referred;

The designation of a committee of three (3) applicants who shall represent all sponsors and subscribers in matters relating to the referendum;

The signatures and addresses of not less than one hundred (100) sponsors who shall be qualified registered voters; and

A statement that the committee of applicants are qualified registered voters who signed the application with the proposed act attached.

History.

2015 ch. 6, § 1, effective February 25, 2015.

§ 22-24-404.
Notice to committee.

Notice to the committee of applicants on any matter pertaining to the application and petition shall be served on any member of the committee in person, by mail or electronically addressed to a committee member at the address indicated on the application.

History.

2015 ch. 6, § 1, effective February 25, 2015.

§ 22-24-405.
Sponsors and circulators.

The one hundred (100) qualified registered voters who subscribe to the application are designated as sponsors. The committee of applicants may designate additional qualified individuals to act as circulators of the petitions by giving written notice, signed by one (1) member of the committee of applicants, to the secretary of state verifying under oath the names, qualifications and addresses of those so designated. An individual shall not be qualified to act as a circulator unless he is a citizen of the United States and is at least eighteen (18) years of age. A member of the committee of applicants may act as a circulator if duly qualified.

The committee of applicants shall file receipt and expenditure reports as required by W.S.

22-25-106

.

History.

2015 ch. 6, § 1, effective February 25, 2015.

§ 22-24-406.
Grounds for denying certification of initiative or referendum application.

The secretary of state shall deny certification of a referendum application if he determines that:

The committee of applicants failed to submit a sufficient number of qualified registered voters as sponsors;

The application is not substantially in the required form; or

More than ninety (90) days have expired since the adjournment of the legislative session at which the act being referred was passed.

History.

2015 ch. 6, § 1, effective February 25, 2015.

§ 22-24-407.
Petitions; generally.

If the application is certified, the secretary of state shall prescribe the form of and prepare petitions containing:

A copy of the act to be referred;

An impartial summary of the subject matter of the act to be referred;

The warning required by W.S.

22-24-408

;

Sufficient space for printed names, signatures and addresses;

If a circulator will be paid to solicit signatures on a petition, each signature page circulated by that circulator shall contain, in twelve (12) point or larger black boldface type, the following statement: “This circulator is being paid to solicit signatures for this ballot proposition.” The statement shall be prominently displayed and made visible to the petition signer by the circulator; and

Other specifications necessary to assure proper handling and control.

Pursuant to rules adopted by the secretary of state, petitions, for purposes of circulation, shall be prepared by the secretary of state at the sponsor’s expense. Petitions shall be printed in a number reasonably calculated to allow full circulation throughout the state. A paid circulator shall solicit signatures on a petition only if each signature page circulated by that circulator contains the statement required under paragraph (a)(v) of this section.

The secretary of state shall number each petition and shall keep a record of the petitions.

Upon request of the committee of applicants, the secretary of state shall report the number of persons who voted in the preceding general election.

The secretary of state, on any printed material circulated by the secretary of state describing the proposition, shall include notice whether any paid circulator was used to gather signatures as required by paragraph (a)(v) of this section.

History.

2015 ch. 6, § 1, effective February 25, 2015.

§ 22-24-408.
Petitions; statement of warning.

Each petition shall include a statement of warning that a person who signs a name other than his own on the petition, or who knowingly signs his name more than once for the same proposition at one (1) election, or who signs the petition knowing that he is not a qualified registered voter, upon conviction, is punishable by a fine of not more than one thousand dollars ($1,000.00) or by imprisonment for not more than one (1) year, or both.

History.

2015 ch. 6, § 1, effective February 25, 2015.

§ 22-24-409.
Petitions; circulation; contests.

The petitions shall be circulated throughout the state only by a sponsor or an individual designated in accordance with W.S.

22-24-405

as a circulator and only in person.

Any person may contest the qualifications of an individual designated as a circulator by filing a petition in the district court within ten (10) days of the solicitation activity. The court shall hear and decide any such action within five (5) days from the date the petition is filed.

Any party prevailing in any action filed pursuant to subsection (b) of this section may be awarded costs and reasonable attorney’s fees by the court. The court shall notify the secretary of state of its findings as to the qualifications of a circulator within five (5) days of the determination.

History.

2015 ch. 6, § 1, effective February 25, 2015.

§ 22-24-410.
Petitions; subscribing to and withdrawing name.

Any qualified registered voter may subscribe to the petition by signing his name and listing his address. A person who has signed the petition may withdraw his name only by giving written notice of his printed name, residence and contact information to the secretary of state before the time that the petition is filed.

History.

2015 ch. 6, § 1, effective February 25, 2015.

§ 22-24-411.
Petitions; verification.

Before a petition is filed, it shall be verified by the sponsor or circulator who personally circulated it. The verification shall be in affidavit form and shall state in substance that:

The person signing the affidavit is a sponsor or an individual designated and qualified in accordance with W.S.

22-24-405

and is the only circulator of that petition;

The signatures on the petition were made in his presence; and

To the best of his knowledge, such signatures are those of the persons whose names they purport to be.

In determining the sufficiency of the petition, the secretary of state shall not:

Count signatures on petitions not properly verified;

Count signatures on a petition circulated by an individual who has been determined not to be a qualified circulator pursuant to W.S.

22-24-409

or by the secretary of state in accordance with rules of his office.

History.

2015 ch. 6, § 1, effective February 25, 2015.

§ 22-24-412.
Petitions; filing by sponsors.

Petitions may be filed with the secretary of state if signed by a sufficient number of qualified registered voters as required by the Wyoming constitution. Petitions may be filed only within ninety (90) days after the adjournment of the legislative session at which the act was passed.

History.

2015 ch. 6, § 1, effective February 25, 2015.

§ 22-24-413.
Petitions; review by secretary of state.

Within not more than sixty (60) days of the date all petitions are filed, the secretary of state shall review the petitions and shall notify the committee of applicants whether the petitions were properly or improperly filed. The petitions shall be determined to be improperly filed if:

There is an insufficient total number of signatures of qualified registered voters;

There is an insufficient number of signatures of qualified registered voters in at least two-thirds (2/3) of the counties of the state; or

The petitions for referendum were not filed within ninety (90) days after the adjournment of the legislative session at which the act was passed.

History.

2015 ch. 6, § 1, effective February 25, 2015.

§ 22-24-414.
Ballot proposition; preparation and contents.

If a sufficient number of qualified petitions are filed, the secretary of state, with the assistance of the attorney general, shall prepare a ballot proposition. The ballot proposition shall give a true and impartial summary of the referred act and shall make provision for approval and for disapproval thereof.

History.

2015 ch. 6, § 1, effective February 25, 2015.

§ 22-24-415.
Ballot proposition; procedure for placing on ballot; publication requirements.

Except as required under subsection (b) of this section, the same procedure for placing constitutional amendment questions on the ballot shall be used to place the referendum ballot proposition on the ballot.

The ballot proposition for a referendum shall be published by the secretary of state in a newspaper of general circulation in the state in the newspaper edition immediately preceding the general election. Publication under this subsection shall contain the text of the referendum ballot and shall identify both a physical location and a web site address or other electronic location where the entire text of the referendum can be viewed.

History.

2015 ch. 6, § 1, effective February 25, 2015.

§ 22-24-416.
Ballot proposition; when placed on ballot.

The ballot proposition for a referendum shall be placed on the election ballot of the first statewide general election held more than one hundred eighty (180) days after adjournment of the legislative session at which the act was passed.

History.

2015 ch. 6, § 1, effective February 25, 2015.

§ 22-24-417.
Insufficiency of application or petition.

A referendum submitted to the voters shall not be void because of the insufficiency of the application or petitions by which the submission was procured.

History.

2015 ch. 6, § 1, effective February 25, 2015.

§ 22-24-418.
Action for review of determination.

Any person aggrieved by any determination made under this article, by the secretary of state or by the attorney general, may bring an action in the district court of Laramie county to have the determination reviewed by filing application within thirty (30) days of the date on which notice of the determination was given.

History.

2015 ch. 6, § 1, effective February 25, 2015.

Cross references. —

As to computing periods of time, see §

22-2-110

.

Applicability. —

Thirty-day period of limitations does not apply to bar constitutional challenges seeking declaratory and injunctive relief from a law adopted by the initiative process. Cathcart v. Meyer, 2004 WY 49, 88 P.3d 1050,

2004 Wyo. LEXIS 62

(Wyo. 2004).

When a voter contested a city clerk's rejection of signatures on a municipal referendum petition, a district court did not have jurisdiction to hear the voter's declaratory judgment petition under former Wyo. Stat. Ann. §

22-24-122

because that statute was clearly limited to review of a determination made by the “secretary of state or by the attorney general” relating to statewide initiatives and referenda, so it was error for the court to determine that the city clerk acted arbitrarily and capriciously in reviewing the petition as he did. City of Casper v. Holloway, 2015 WY 93, 354 P.3d 65,

2015 Wyo. LEXIS 109

(Wyo. 2015).

Action timely commenced. —

Since the pro-choice advocates brought their action for declaratory and injunctive relief as to all issues within the 30-day period following the determination by the secretary of state that the initiative qualified for the ballot, it was a timely action under the statute. Wyoming Nat'l Abortion Rights Action League v. Karpan, 881 P.2d 281,

1994 Wyo. LEXIS 100

(Wyo. 1994).

§ 22-24-419.
Penalties.

Any person who signs a name other than his own on a petition for referendum, or who knowingly signs his name more than once for the same proposition at one (1) election, upon conviction, shall be fined not more than one thousand dollars ($1,000.00) or imprisoned for not more than one (1) year, or both.

Any member of the committee of applicants, sponsor or circulator who knowingly and willfully makes a false verification of the qualifications of a circulator pursuant to W.S. 22-24-405(a) or knowingly and willfully makes a false verification under W.S.

22-24-411

, shall be guilty of false swearing and subject to the penalties provided by W.S.

22-26-101

.

History.

2015 ch. 6, § 1, effective February 25, 2015.

Quoted

in

Thomson v. Wyoming In-Stream Flow Comm., 651 P.2d 778,

1982 Wyo. LEXIS 387

(Wyo. 1982).

Law reviews. —

For case note, “Administrative Law — Initiative and Referendum. Initiative Petitions in Wyoming — The Presumption of Validity and the Secretary of State's Review. Thomson v. Wyoming In-Stream Flow Comm., 651 P.2d 778,

1982 Wyo. LEXIS 387

(Wyo. 1982),” see XVIII Land & Water L. Rev. 857 (1983).

§ 22-24-420.
Petitions; payment for signatures; misrepresentation of petition; prohibition; penalty.

Repealed by Laws 2018, ch. 118, § 2.

A circulator of a referendum petition or a person who causes the circulation of a referendum petition may not pay or offer to pay any compensation to another person for that person’s signature on the referendum petition.

A circulator of a referendum petition or a person who causes the circulation of a referendum petition shall not collect another person’s signature on the petition by knowingly making a false statement with respect to or otherwise misrepresenting the referred act contained within the referendum petition. A violation of this subsection is subject to the penalty imposed under W.S. 22-24-419(a).

History.

2015 ch. 6, § 1, effective February 25, 2015; 2018 ch. 118, § 2, effective March 14, 2018.

The 2018 amendment,

repealed former (a), which read: "A circulator of a referendum petition or a person who causes the circulation of a referendum petition may not receive payment for the collection of signatures if that payment is based upon the number of signatures collected. Nothing in this section prohibits a circulator of a referendum petition or a person who causes the circulation of a referendum petition from being paid a salary that is not based upon the number of signatures collected."

Laws 2018, ch. 118, § 3, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 14, 2018.